Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-725
Information,
report; confidential; violation; penalty.

All
information of the department concerning reports of child abuse or neglect
of noninstitutional children, including information in the tracking system
of child protection cases maintained pursuant to section 28-715 or records
in the central registry of child protection
cases maintained pursuant to section 28-718, and all information of the department
generated as a result of such reports or records, shall be confidential and
shall not be disclosed except as specifically authorized by the Child Protection and Family Safety Act and
section 81-3126 or other applicable law. The subject of the report of child
abuse or neglect may authorize any individual or organization to receive the
following information from the central registry of child protection
cases maintained pursuant to section 28-718 which relates or pertains to him
or her: (1) The date of the alleged child abuse or neglect; and (2) the classification
of the case pursuant to section 28-720. Permitting, assisting, or encouraging
the unauthorized release of any information contained in such reports or records
shall be a Class V misdemeanor.

Laws 1979, LB 505, § 13;

Laws 1982, LB 522, § 8;

Laws 2002, LB 642, § 7;

Laws 2005, LB 116, § 17;

Laws 2008, LB782, § 2;

Laws 2014, LB853, § 15.